Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 366.161 is amended to read:
366.161. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a  program to reduce wildlife-
vehicle collisions and promote public safety  in  priority areas where wildlife corridors identified
in the Wildlife Corridor Action Plan by the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife intersect with
proposed or existing public roads.
(2) The program [ shall] must  include, but need not be limited to[ ,]:
(a) Feasibility studies;
(b) Plans for creating or modifying road infrastructure in a manner that reduces wildlife-vehicle
collisions and promotes public safety[ .];
(c) Updates to  wildlife guidance materials and standards, and to specifications of high-
ways, to incorporate wildlife crossing and wildlife-vehicle collision reduction features into the
design, construction and modification of highways;
(d) A training program, established in coordination with the State Department of  Fish
and Wildlife, that is designed to educate relevant Department of Transportation employees
and other stakeholders on the interaction  of transportation systems and infrastructure with
wildlife and wildlife habitats; and
(e) A list of priority projects to reduce collisions between wildlife and vehicles that:
(A) Is developed jointly  with the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, with opportunity
for public input; and
(B) Is made publicly available on a website of the Department of Transportation.
(3) The [ plans] program  may include but need not be limited to the use of wildlife crossing
structures and roadway fencing.
[(2)] (4) To the  extent practicable, the Department of Transportation shall coordinate with local
governments, as defined in ORS 174.116, and the tribal governments for tribes and bands listed under
ORS 172.110, to achieve the goals of the program described in this section.
(5) Under  the program, and in coordination with the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, the Department  of Transportation shall consider and, to the maximum extent fea-
sible, plan for  and incorporate measures and infrastructure to promote the avoidance, min-
Enrolled House Bill 2978 (HB 2978-A) Page 1
imization and mitigation of impacts to  wildlife corridor connectivity from the construction,
improvement, operation and maintenance of transportation  infrastructure throughout this
state.
(6) Projects under the program that impact  threatened or endangered species, or species
of greatest conservation need as identified by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife,
must include mitigation of  impacts and crossing infrastructure, to the greatest extent fea-
sible.
SECTION 2.
(1) To inform  the program described in ORS 366.161, the Department of
Transportation and the State Department of Fish and Wildlife  shall enter into a joint mem-
orandum of understanding under which the agencies shall establish an advisory group for:
(a) Collaborating on the goals of the program;
(b) Coordinating the capacity, resources and fundraising opportunities and assistance;
(c) Sharing relevant science;
(d) Coordinating community outreach; and
(e) Assisting with identifying priority areas and priority projects to  reduce wildlife-
vehicle conflicts and improve habitat connectivity.
(2) The memorandum of understanding  may designate a willing nongovernmental entity
to serve as a neutral facilitator of the advisory group.
(3) The advisory group shall:
(a) Consist of diverse participants, such as  participants from federal, state and local
governments, academia and nonprofit organizations, as well as participants with  biology and
engineering backgrounds.
(b) Meet on a regular basis, and at least once annually through December 31, 2033.
(4) The Department of Transportation shall make available  on a department website the
materials from meetings of  the advisory group and any recommendations from the advisory
group.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2035.
SECTION 4.  ORS 366.162 is amended to read:
366.162. [(1) The Department of Transportation shall establish the program required under ORS
366.161 no later than December 31, 2023. ]
[(2) Until the Department of Transportation  establishes the program, the Department of Transpor-
tation and the State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall coordinate efforts to reduce  wildlife-vehicle
collisions based on  the data gathered under ORS 496.272. The Department of Transportation shall
consider the benefit of including a  wildlife crossing as part of a project if the data suggests that such
a crossing could significantly reduce wildlife-vehicle collisions. ]
[(3)] (1)  The Department of  Transportation shall report biennially regarding the status of the
program required under ORS  366.161 to interim or regular Senate and House committees relating
to natural resources in the manner provided by ORS 192.245.
(2) The report [ shall] must  include, but not be limited to[ ,]:
(a) Information concerning the number and  types of wildlife corridor infrastructure projects
that have been  established , studied or planned [ and];
(b) A description of a timeline  for implementing the proposed and prioritized wildlife
corridor infrastructure projects;
(c) An estimate of the costs and funding sources for  proposed and prioritized wildlife
corridor infrastructure projects;
(d) A description of actions the department has taken to secure funding  for the program,
including from all  relevant federal grant opportunities and other public and private funding
sources;
(e) A strategy for ongoing funding for the program, including department plans to:
(A) Ensure the existence of one or more dedicated funding sources that  meet program
needs; and
(B) Secure federal competitive grants;
Enrolled House Bill 2978 (HB 2978-A) Page 2
(f) A description  of  the realized or expected [ effect] effects  of established , studied or planned
wildlife corridor infrastructure projects on the number of wildlife-vehicle collisions[ .]; and
(g) A description  of efforts and successes of the advisory group described in section 2 of
this 2025 Act, including efforts and successes related to:
(A) Moneys directed to projects through public-private funding partnerships;
(B) Community and stakeholder engagement; and
(C) Addressing priority areas, as described in ORS 366.161 (1).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 366.162, as amended by section 4 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
366.162. (1) The Department of Transportation shall report biennially regarding  the status of the
program required under ORS 366.161 to interim or regular Senate and  House committees relating
to natural resources in the manner provided by ORS 192.245.
(2) The report must include, but not be limited to:
(a) Information concerning the number and types of  wildlife corridor infrastructure projects that
have been established, studied or planned;
(b) A description  of a timeline for implementing the proposed and prioritized wildlife corridor
infrastructure projects;
(c) An estimate of the costs  and funding sources for proposed and prioritized wildlife corridor
infrastructure projects;
(d) A description of  actions the department has taken to secure funding for the program, in-
cluding from all relevant federal grant opportunities and other public and private funding sources;
(e) A strategy for ongoing funding for the program, including department plans to:
(A) Ensure the existence of one or  more dedicated funding sources that meet program needs;
and
(B) Secure federal competitive grants;  and
(f) A description of the  realized or expected effects of established, studied or planned wildlife
corridor infrastructure projects on the number of wildlife-vehicle collisions[ ; and ].
[(g) A description of efforts and  successes of the advisory group described in section 2 of this 2025
Act, including efforts and successes related to: ]
[(A) Moneys directed to projects through public-private funding partnerships; ]
[(B) Community and stakeholder engagement; and ]
[(C) Addressing priority areas, as described in ORS 366.161 (1). ]
SECTION 6.
The amendments to ORS 366.162 by  section 5 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 2, 2035.
SECTION 7. (1) Contingent on available funding, the State  Department of Fish and
Wildlife shall undertake or  plan to undertake projects to support wildlife mobility and habitat
connectivity within priority areas identified in the Oregon Connectivity Assessment and
Mapping Project.
(2) In carrying out  this section, the department shall consider opportunities to secure
competitive federal grants, and other matching funds, for relevant projects.
Enrolled House Bill 2978 (HB 2978-A) Page 3
Passed by House March 31, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 30, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2978 (HB 2978-A) Page 4